tables/en-g2-common.cti
# common word contractions for UEB, US and UK grade 2.

### UEB rulebook section 10.1, Alphabetic word signs
# Use the alphabetic wordsign when the word it represents is "standing 
# alone".

word but 12
word can 14
word do 145
word every 15
word from 124
word go 1245
word have 125
word just 245
word knowledge 13
word like 123
word more 134
word not 1345
word people 1234
word quite 12345
word rather 1235
word so 234
word that 2345
word us 136
word very 1236
word it 1346
word you 13456
word as 1356
word will 2456

### ueb rulebook, 10.1.2
# Use the alphabetic wordsign when the word it represents is followed 
# by an apostrophe with the following letters: d, ll, re, s, t, ve,
# provided the resulting word is standing alone.
#
# [note] [todo]: the list below was automatically generated, and may not form valid words, but they do 
# follow the rules.
# We should probably carefully go through and remove those that are not valid words.

word but'd 12-3-145
word but'll 12-3-123-123
word but're 12-3-1235-15
word but's 12-3-234
word but't 12-3-2345
word but've 12-3-1236-15
word can'd 14-3-145
word can'll 14-3-123-123
word can're 14-3-1235-15
word can's 14-3-234
word can't 14-3-2345
word can've 14-3-1236-15
word do'd 145-3-145
word do'll 145-3-123-123
word do're 145-3-1235-15
word do's 145-3-234
word do't 145-3-2345
word do've 145-3-1236-15
word every'd 15-3-145
word every'll 15-3-123-123
word every're 15-3-1235-15
word every's 15-3-234
word every't 15-3-2345
word every've 15-3-1236-15
word from'd 124-3-145
word from'll 124-3-123-123
word from're 124-3-1235-15
word from's 124-3-234
word from't 124-3-2345
word from've 124-3-1236-15
word go'd 1245-3-145
word go'll 1245-3-123-123
word go're 1245-3-1235-15
word go's 1245-3-234
word go't 1245-3-2345
word go've 1245-3-1236-15
word have'd 125-3-145
word have'll 125-3-123-123
word have're 125-3-1235-15
word have's 125-3-234
word have't 125-3-2345
word have've 125-3-1236-15
word just'd 245-3-145
word just'll 245-3-123-123
word just're 245-3-1235-15
word just's 245-3-234
word just't 245-3-2345
word just've 245-3-1236-15
word knowledge'd 13-3-145
word knowledge'll 13-3-123-123
word knowledge're 13-3-1235-15
word knowledge's 13-3-234
word knowledge't 13-3-2345
word knowledge've 13-3-1236-15
word like'd 123-3-145
word like'll 123-3-123-123
word like're 123-3-1235-15
word like's 123-3-234
word like't 123-3-2345
word like've 123-3-1236-15
word more'd 134-3-145
word more'll 134-3-123-123
word more're 134-3-1235-15
word more's 134-3-234
word more't 134-3-2345
word more've 134-3-1236-15
word not'd 1345-3-145
word not'll 1345-3-123-123
word not're 1345-3-1235-15
word not's 1345-3-234
word not't 1345-3-2345
word not've 1345-3-1236-15
word people'd 1234-3-145
word people'll 1234-3-123-123
word people're 1234-3-1235-15
word people's 1234-3-234
word people't 1234-3-2345
word people've 1234-3-1236-15
word quite'd 12345-3-145
word quite'll 12345-3-123-123
word quite're 12345-3-1235-15
word quite's 12345-3-234
word quite't 12345-3-2345
word quite've 12345-3-1236-15
word rather'd 1235-3-145
word rather'll 1235-3-123-123
word rather're 1235-3-1235-15
word rather's 1235-3-234
word rather't 1235-3-2345
word rather've 1235-3-1236-15
word so'd 234-3-145
word so'll 234-3-123-123
word so're 234-3-1235-15
word so's 234-3-234
word so't 234-3-2345
word so've 234-3-1236-15
word that'd 2345-3-145
word that'll 2345-3-123-123
word that're 2345-3-1235-15
word that's 2345-3-234
word that't 2345-3-2345
word that've 2345-3-1236-15
word us'd 136-3-145
word us'll 136-3-123-123
word us're 136-3-1235-15
word us's 136-3-234
word us't 136-3-2345
word us've 136-3-1236-15
word very'd 1236-3-145
word very'll 1236-3-123-123
word very're 1236-3-1235-15
word very's 1236-3-234
word very't 1236-3-2345
word very've 1236-3-1236-15
word it'd 1346-3-145
word it'll 1346-3-123-123
word it're 1346-3-1235-15
word it's 1346-3-234
word it't 1346-3-2345
word it've 1346-3-1236-15
word you'd 13456-3-145
word you'll 13456-3-123-123
word you're 13456-3-1235-15
word you's 13456-3-234
word you't 13456-3-2345
word you've 13456-3-1236-15
word as'd 1356-3-145
word as'll 1356-3-123-123
word as're 1356-3-1235-15
word as's 1356-3-234
word as't 1356-3-2345
word as've 1356-3-1236-15
word will'd 2456-3-145
word will'll 2456-3-123-123
word will're 2456-3-1235-15
word will's 2456-3-234
word will't 2456-3-2345
word will've 2456-3-1236-15


### UEB rulebook section 10.2, strong wordsigns
# Use the strong wordsign when the word it represents is "standing alone.

word child 16
word shall 146
word this 1456
word which 156
word out 1256
word still 34

### UEB rulebook section 10.2.2
# Use the strong wordsign when the word it represents is followed by
# an apostrophe with the following letters: d, ll, re, s, t, ve,
# provided that the resulting word is standing alone.
#
# [note] [todo]: the list below was automatically generated, and may not form valid words, but they do
# follow the rules.
# We should probably carefully go through and remove those that are not valid words.

word child'd 16-3-145
word child'll 16-3-123-123
word child're 16-3-1235-15
word child's 16-3-234
word child't 16-3-2345
word child've 16-3-1236-15
word shall'd 146-3-145
word shall'll 146-3-123-123
word shall're 146-3-1235-15
word shall's 146-3-234
word shall't 146-3-2345
word shall've 146-3-1236-15
word this'd 1456-3-145
word this'll 1456-3-123-123
word this're 1456-3-1235-15
word this's 1456-3-234
word this't 1456-3-2345
word this've 1456-3-1236-15
word which'd 156-3-145
word which'll 156-3-123-123
word which're 156-3-1235-15
word which's 156-3-234
word which't 156-3-2345
word which've 156-3-1236-15
word out'd 1256-3-145
word out'll 1256-3-123-123
word out're 1256-3-1235-15
word out's 1256-3-234
word out't 1256-3-2345
word out've 1256-3-1236-15
word still'd 34-3-145
word still'll 34-3-123-123
word still're 34-3-1235-15
word still's 34-3-234
word still't 34-3-2345
word still've 34-3-1236-15

### UEB rulebook section 10.3, strong contractions
# Use the strong contraction wherever the letters it represents occur
# unless other rules limit its use.
#
# [note] [todo]: need to add the exceptions to the test harness, remove this todo when done.

partword and 12346
partword for 123456
partword of 12356
partword the 2346
partword with 23456


### UEB rulebook section 10.4, strong groupsigns
# Use the strong groupsign wherever the letters it represents occur
# unless other rules limit its use.
#
# [note] [todo]: need to add the exceptions to the test harness, remove this todo when done.


partword ch 16
partword gh 126
partword sh 146
partword th 1456
partword wh 156
partword ed 1246
partword er 12456
partword ou 1256
partword ow 246
partword st 34
# "ing" 346, see 10.4.3.
partword ar 345


### UEB rulebook section 10.4.2
# When the use of a strong groupsign for 
# "ch", "sh", "th", "wh", "ou" or "st" 
# would be misread as a word, braille the letters individually.
#
# [note] [todo]: our use of partword should guard against this from happening.
# but just incase it doesn't we might need add a list of exception words or find another pattern.
# [todo]: add the examples to test harness.

### UEB rulebook section 10.4.3
# Use the strong groupsign for "ing" wherever the letters it represents occur except at the 
# beginning of a word.
midendword ing 346


### end ###


word again 1-1245
contraction ag
word against 1-1245-34
contraction agst
word almost 1-123-134
contraction alm
word already 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word also 1-123
contraction al
word although 1-123-1456
word altogether 1-123-2345
contraction alt
word always 1-123-2456
contraction alw
word either 15-24
contraction ei
word herself 125-12456-124
word him 125-134
contraction hm
word himself 125-134-124
contraction hmf
word its 1346-234
word itself 1346-124
word must 134-34
word myself 134-13456-124
word neither 1345-15-24
word oneself 5-135-124
word said 234-145
word such 234-16
word themselves 2346-134-1236-234
word these 45-2346 
word those 45-1456
word upon 45-136
word whose 45-156
word you 13456
word your 13456-1235
word yours 13456-1235-234
word yourself 13456-1235-124
word yourselves 13456-1235-1236-234
